Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-328
Finance company, defined.

Finance company means any person engaged in the business of financing sales of motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers, or purchasing or acquiring promissory notes, secured instruments, or other documents by which the motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers are pledged as security for payment of obligations arising from such sales and who may find it necessary to engage in the activity of repossession and the sale of the motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers so pledged.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 28.